Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 279A.025 is amended to read:
279A.025. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Public  Contracting
Code applies to all public contracting.
(2) The Public Contracting Code does not apply to:
(a) Contracts between a contracting agency and:
(A) Another contracting agency;
(B) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(C) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(D) The Oregon State Bar;
(E) A governmental body of another state;
(F) The federal government;
(G) A Federally Funded Research and Development Center  that the National Science
Foundation, or  a successor agency, includes in the Master Government List of Federally
Funded R&D Centers, or a similar list, however named, that the foundation or the successor
agency makes publicly available;
[(G)] (H) An American Indian tribe or an agency of an American Indian tribe;
[(H)] (I)  A nation, or a governmental body in a nation, other than the United States; or
[(I)] (J) An intergovernmental entity formed between or among:
(i) Governmental bodies of this or another state;
(ii) The federal government;
(iii) An American Indian tribe or an agency of an American Indian tribe;
(iv) A nation other than the United States; or
(v) A governmental body in a nation other than the United States;
(b) Agreements authorized by ORS chapter  190 or by a statute, charter provision, ordinance or
other authority for establishing agreements between or among governmental bodies or  agencies or
tribal governing bodies or agencies;
(c) Insurance and service contracts  as provided for under ORS 414.115, 414.125, 414.135 and
414.145 for purposes of source selection;
(d) Grants;
Enrolled House Bill 2565 (HB 2565-A) Page 1
(e) Contracts for professional or expert witnesses or consultants to provide  services or testi-
mony relating to  existing or potential litigation or legal matters in which a public body is or may
become  interested;
(f) Acquisitions or disposals of real property or interest in real property;
(g) Sole-source expenditures when rates are set by law or ordinance for purposes of  source se-
lection;
(h) Contracts for the procurement or distribution of textbooks;
(i) Procurements by a contracting agency from an Oregon Corrections Enterprises program;
(j) The procurement, transportation,  sale or distribution of distilled liquor, as defined in ORS
471.001, or the appointment of agents under ORS 471.230 or 471.750 by the Oregon Liquor  and
Cannabis Commission;
(k) Contracts entered into under ORS  chapter 180 between the Attorney General and private
counsel or special legal assistants;
(L) Contracts for the sale of timber from lands that the  State Board of Forestry, the State
Forestry Department, the  State Parks and Recreation Commission or the State Parks and Recreation
Department owns or manages;
(m) Contracts for activities necessary or convenient for  the sale of timber under paragraph (L)
of this subsection, either separately from or in conjunction with  contracts for the sale of timber,
including but not limited to activities  such as timber harvesting and sorting, transporting, gravel
pit development or operation, and road construction, maintenance or improvement;
(n) Contracts for forest protection or forest  related activities, as described in ORS 477.406, by
the State Forester or the State Board of Forestry;
(o) Contracts that the Housing and Community Services  Department enters into in exercising
the department’s duties prescribed in ORS chapters 456 and 458, or procurements described  in ORS
456.625 (19);
(p) Contracts that the State Treasurer enters into in exercising the powers of that office pre-
scribed in ORS 178.010 to 178.090 and 276A.242 and ORS chapters 286A,  287A, 289, 293, 294 and 295,
including but not limited to investment contracts  and agreements, banking services, clearing house
services and collateralization agreements, bond  documents, certificates of participation and other
debt repayment agreements, and  any associated contracts, agreements and documents, regardless
of whether the obligations  that the contracts, agreements or documents establish are general, spe-
cial or limited, except that the State Treasurer’s public  contracting for goods and services is subject
to ORS chapter 279B;
(q) Contracts, agreements or  other documents entered into, issued or established in connection
with:
(A) The issuance of obligations, as defined in ORS 286A.100 and 287A.310, of a public body;
(B) Program  loans and similar extensions or advances of funds, aid or assistance that a public
body makes to  a public or private body for the purpose of carrying out, promoting or sustaining
activities or programs authorized by law; or
(C) The investment of funds by a public body as authorized by law, and other  financial trans-
actions of a public body that by their character cannot practically be  established under the com-
petitive contractor selection procedures of ORS 279B.050 to 279B.085;
(r) Contracts for employee benefit plans as provided in ORS 243.105 (1), 243.125 (4),  243.221,
243.275, 243.291, 243.303 and 243.565;
(s) Contracts for employee benefit plans as provided in ORS 243.860 to 243.886; or
(t) Any other public contracting of a public body  specifically exempted from the code by another
provision of law.
(3) The Public Contracting Code does not apply to the contracting activities of:
(a) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(b) The legislative department;
(c) The judicial department;
Enrolled House Bill 2565 (HB 2565-A) Page 2
(d) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454, except as  provided in ORS 279.835 to
279.855 and 279A.250 to 279A.290;
(e) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(f) The Oregon Film and Video Office, except as provided in ORS 279A.100 and 279A.250  to
279A.290;
(g) The Travel Information Council, except as provided in ORS 279A.250 to 279A.290;
(h) The Oregon 529 Savings Network and the Oregon 529 Savings Board;
(i) The Oregon Innovation Council;
(j) The Oregon Utility Notification Center; or
(k) Any other public body specifically exempted from the code by another provision of law.
(4) ORS 279A.200  to 279A.225 and 279B.050 to 279B.085 do not apply to contracts made with
qualified nonprofit  agencies providing employment opportunities for individuals with disabilities un-
der ORS 279.835 to 279.855.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2565 (HB 2565-A) Page 3